Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5903.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 134. (1) The director shall establish a comprehensive
system of licensing for psychiatric hospitals and psychiatric units
in the this state to protect the public by ensuring that these
psychiatric hospitals and psychiatric units provide the facilities
and the ancillary supporting services necessary to maintain a high
quality of patient care. Separate criteria shall must be developed
for licensing hospital beds for minors.
(2) A psychiatric hospital or psychiatric unit licensed to
provide both adult and minor psychiatric inpatient services may use
WAM H05654'25 (H-1) ycdbep


a licensed inpatient psychiatric bed on a temporary basis for an
adult or minor if doing so is in the best interest of the patient,
the patient's needs can be adequately met in the unit, the patient
is compatible with other patients in the unit, and doing so is
necessary to meet the psychiatric hospital's or psychiatric unit's
patient care needs and the psychiatric hospital or psychiatric unit
complies with applicable safety, staffing, and treatment
requirements established by the department. This subsection only
applies to a psychiatric hospital or psychiatric unit that is
already licensed and operational and approved under a valid
certificate of need issued under part 222 of the public health
code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.22201 to 333.22260, before the effective
date of the amendatory act that added this section.
(3) Temporary use of a licensed inpatient psychiatric bed
under subsection (2) does not change the licensed designation of
the bed or constitute a change in bed capacity, service category,
bed classification, number of approved beds, or department
inventory of beds for the purpose of a certificate of need review
under part 222 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL
333.22201 to 333.22260, or any other certificate of need review
standard.
(4) An individual patient placement that exceeds temporary
does not violate this section if the psychiatric hospital or
psychiatric unit demonstrates ongoing clinical necessity and is
pursuing a discharge or extension or is arranging a transfer to an
appropriately designated bed.
(5) (2) The director shall coordinate all functions within
state government affecting psychiatric hospitals, and shall
cooperate with other state agencies that establish standards or
WAM H05654'25 (H-1) ycdbep


requirements for facilities providing mental health care to assure
ensure necessary, equitable, and consistent state regulation of
these the facilities without duplication of inspections or
services. The director may enter into agreements with other state
agencies to accomplish this purpose.
(6) As used in this section, "temporary" means a period of not
more than 90 consecutive days for an individual patient placement
unless a 90-day extension is appropriate and approved by the
department based on demonstrated clinical necessity or capacity
limitations.
Final Page
WAM H05654'25 (H-1) ycdbep